District of Columbia statutes.
9-1213.01

Construction or maintenance within fire limits.

No fence, barrier, or obstruction consisting or made, in whole or in part, of what is commonly called barbed wire shall be erected, constructed, or maintained along the line of or in or upon any street, avenue, alley, road, or other public walk, driveway, or public or private parking within the fire limits of the District of Columbia.

July 8, 1898, 30 Stat. 724, ch. 640, § 1
This section is referenced in § 9-1213.03.
1981 Ed., § 7-801.
1973 Ed., § 7-1101.